Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.102.010 and 2024 c 64 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "911 communications center(([,]))," for purposes of this chapter(([,])), means a public safety answering point or any other entity that captures and maintains data that is utilized in a 911 emergency communications system, as defined in RCW 38.52.010.(2) "Advisory board" means the office of independent investigations advisory board.(3) "Deadly force" has the meaning provided in RCW 9A.16.010.(4) "Director" means the director of the office of independent investigations.(5) "Great bodily harm" has the meaning provided in RCW 9A.04.110.(6) "In-custody" refers to a person who is under the physical control of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.(7) "Independent investigation team" means a team of qualified and certified peace officer investigators, civilian crime scene specialists, and other representatives who operate independently of any involved agency to conduct investigations of police deadly force incidents. An independent investigation team may be comprised of multiple law enforcement agencies who jointly investigate police use of force incidents in their geographical regions or may be a single law enforcement agency, provided it is not the involved agency.(8) "Involved agency" means ((a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined in RCW 10.93.020,))the agency that employs or supervises the officer or officers who are an involved officer as defined in this section, or an agency responsible for a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.(9) "Involved officer" means one of the following persons who is involved in an incident as an actor or custodial officer in which the act or omission by the individual is within the scope of the jurisdiction of the office as defined in this chapter:(a) A ((general authority Washington peace officer, specially commissioned Washington peace officer, or limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020))peace officer, whether on or off duty if he or she is exercising his or her authority as a peace officer; or(b) An individual while employed in a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.(10) "Office" means the office of independent investigations.(11) "Substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.Sec. 2. RCW 43.102.030 and 2021 c 318 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:In addition to other responsibilities set forth in this chapter, the office shall:(1) Conduct fair, thorough, transparent, and competent investigations of police use of force and other incidents involving law enforcement as authorized in this chapter and shall prioritize investigations conducted by the office based on resources and other criteria developed in consultation with the advisory board((. The office shall commence investigations as follows:(a) Beginning no later than July 1, 2022, the office is authorized to conduct investigations of deadly force cases occurring after July 1, 2022, including any incident involving use of deadly force by an involved officer against or upon a person who is in-custody or out-of-custody; and(b) Beginning no later than July 1, 2023, the office is authorized to review, and may investigate, prior investigations of deadly force by an involved officer if new evidence is brought forth that was not included in the initial investigation));(2) Analyze data available to the office and provide reports and recommendations as appropriate based on the data regarding issues, trends, and other relevant areas;(3) Provide reports on activities of the office as authorized under this chapter; and(4) Carry out such other responsibilities as may be consistent with this chapter.Sec. 3. RCW 43.102.080 and 2024 c 64 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The office has jurisdiction over, and is authorized to conduct investigations of, all cases and incidents as established within this section.(2)(a) The director may cause an investigation to be conducted into any incident:(i) ((Of a))Involving: (A) A use of deadly force by an involved officer ((occurring after July 1, 2022, including any incident involving use of deadly force by an involved officer against or upon a person who is in-custody or out-of-custody)); or (B) any death that occurs during or after any other use of force by an involved officer if the use of force may have caused or contributed, directly or indirectly, to the death; or(ii) Involving prior investigations of: (A) A use of deadly force by an involved officer; or (B) any death that occurred during or after any other use of force by an involved officer if the use of force may have caused or contributed, directly or indirectly, to the death, if new evidence is brought forth that was not included in the initial investigation.(b) This section applies only if, at the time of the incident:(i) The involved officer was on duty; or(ii) The involved officer was off duty but:(A) Engaged in the investigation, pursuit, detention, or arrest of a person or otherwise exercising the powers of a general authority or limited authority Washington peace officer; or(B) The incident involved equipment or other property issued to the official in relation to his or her duties.(3) The director shall determine prioritization of investigations based on resources and other criteria which may be established in consultation with the advisory board. The director shall ensure that incidents occurring after the date the office begins investigating cases receive the highest priority for investigation.(4) The investigation should include a review of the entire incident, including but not limited to events immediately preceding the incident that may have contributed to or influenced the outcome of the incident that are directly related to the incident under investigation.(5) Upon receiving notification required in RCW 43.102.120 of an incident under the jurisdiction of the office, the director:(a) May cause the incident to be investigated in accordance with this chapter;(b) May determine investigation is not appropriate for reasons including, but not limited to, the case not being in the category of prioritized cases; or(c) If the director determines that the incident is not within the office's jurisdiction to investigate, the director shall decline to investigate, and shall give notice of the fact to the involved agency.(6) If the director determines the case is to be investigated the director will communicate the decision to investigate to the involved agency and will thereafter be the lead investigative body in the case and have priority over any other state or local agency investigating the incident or a case that is under the jurisdiction of the office. The director will implement the process developed pursuant to RCW 43.102.050 and conduct the appropriate investigation in accordance with the process.(7) In conducting the investigation the office shall have access to, and copies of, reports and information necessary or related to the investigation in the custody and control of the involved agency, 911 emergency communication centers, and any law enforcement agency responding to the scene of the incident as soon as possible. This includes, but is not limited to, voice or video recordings, body camera recordings, and officer notes, as well as disciplinary and administrative records except those that might be statements conducted as part of an administrative investigation related to the incident. In addition, the office shall have access to, and copies of, reports and information necessary or related to the investigation in the custody and control of any responding fire department or ambulance service; however, to the extent such information constitutes health care information, such information may only be provided with the consent of the patient or the patient's next of kin or pursuant to a court order.(8) The investigation shall be concluded within 120 days of acceptance of the case for investigation. If the office is not able to complete the investigation within 120 days, the director shall report to the advisory board the reasons for the delay.Sec. 4. RCW 43.102.120 and 2024 c 64 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An involved agency shall notify the office of any incident by an involved officer in accordance with the requirements under RCW 43.102.050 and pursuant to this section.(a) If the incident involves use of deadly force by an involved officer that results in death, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm, or any other use of force by an involved officer where there is good reason to believe the use of force may have caused or contributed, directly or indirectly, to a death, the involved agency must immediately contact the office pursuant to the procedure established by the director once the involved agency personnel and other first responders have rendered the scene safe and provided or facilitated lifesaving first aid to persons at the scene who have life-threatening injuries. This requirement does not affect the duty of law enforcement under RCW 36.28A.445.(b) If a death does not occur during or shortly after a use of force other than deadly force, notification to the office does not need to be made immediately after the scene is safe and lifesaving measures have been taken; provided, however, that the involved agency must notify the office as soon as there is good reason to believe the use of force may have caused or contributed, directly or indirectly to a death.(c) In all other cases, the involved agency must notify the office of the incident pursuant to the procedure established by the director.(2)(a) In any case that requires notice to the director under this section, the involved agency shall ensure that any officers or employees over which the involved agency has authority who are at the scene of the incident take all lawful measures necessary for the purposes of protecting, obtaining, or preserving evidence relating to the incident until an office investigator, or independent investigation team at the request of the office, takes charge of the scene.(b) The primary focus of the involved agency must be the protection and preservation of evidence in order to maintain the integrity of the scene until the office investigator or independent investigation team arrives or otherwise provides direction regarding activities at the scene. The involved agency should ensure that evidence, including but not limited to the following is protected and preserved:(i) Physical evidence that is at risk of being destroyed or disappearing and cannot be easily reconstructed, including evidence which may be degraded or tainted by human or environmental factors if left unprotected or unpreserved;(ii) Identification and contact information for witnesses to the incident; and(iii) Photographs and other methods of documenting the location of physical evidence and location and perspective of witnesses.(3)(a) When the office investigator, or independent investigation team acting at the request of the office, arrives at the scene of an incident under the jurisdiction of the office, the involved agency will relinquish control of the scene to the office investigator or independent investigation team upon the request of the office investigator. The involved agency has a duty to comply with the requests of the office related to the investigation conducted pursuant to this chapter.(b) Once the scene is relinquished, no member of the involved agency may participate in any way in the investigation, with the exception of the use of specialized equipment that is necessary for the investigation and where no alternative exists. If there is any equipment of the involved agency used in the investigation, steps must be taken to appropriately limit the role of any involved agency personnel in facilitating the use of that equipment or their engagement with the investigation.(4) If an independent investigation team takes control of the scene at the request of the office, the independent investigation team shall relinquish control of the scene and investigation at the request of the office when the office is on the scene or otherwise provides notice that the office is taking control of the scene. The independent investigation team may ((continue to)) engage in the investigation ((conducted at the scene)) if requested to do so by the lead office investigator, director, or the director's designee. The involvement of the independent investigation team is limited to activities requested by the office and must terminate following the securing of the scene and any evidence preservation or other actions as determined necessary by the office ((at the scene)). The independent investigation team may not continue to participate in the ongoing investigation.(5)(a) No information about the ongoing independent investigation under the jurisdiction of the office may be shared with any member of the involved agency, except as follows:(i) Limited briefings given to the chief or sheriff of the involved agency about the progress of the investigation; or(ii) Information essential to protect the safety of the community or the integrity of any ongoing, urgent criminal investigation; and(iii) Sharing of the information will not impede the ongoing investigation being conducted by the office.(b) No information provided under (a) of this subsection may be divulged to any involved officers or witness officers. If any information is disclosed pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, the following must also occur:(i) The office must document the exact information provided, to whom it was provided, and the reason it was provided;(ii) The involved agency must agree in writing that no involved officer or witness officer will have access to the information other than what is released to the general public. Any press release containing information provided by the office pursuant to this section must be preapproved by the office; and(iii) The person, family, or representative of any person who is the subject of the action by the involved officer that is under investigation by the office must be notified by the office that the information was provided and, as soon as possible without jeopardizing the integrity of any investigation, be provided with the information contained in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.(6) If the office declines to investigate a case, the authority and duty to investigate remains with the independent investigation team or local law enforcement authority with jurisdiction over the incident.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.102 RCW to read as follows:The following investigative and private information is confidential and exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW:(1) All investigative records compiled or prepared by the office in connection with a review or investigation conducted pursuant to RCW 43.102.080(2)(a) (i) or (ii), until such time as the matter has been referred to the prosecutor for a decision on whether criminal charges should be filed; and(2) All noninvestigative records related to a review or investigation by the office to the extent they contain information that implicates an individual's personal privacy pursuant to RCW 42.56.050, including information concerning support services pursuant to RCW 43.102.050(2)(d).Sec. 6. RCW 42.56.240 and 2024 c 299 s 2 and 2024 c 298 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any person's right to privacy;(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim, or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070, except that copies of license applications or information on the applications may be released to law enforcement or corrections agencies or to persons and entities as authorized under RCW 9.41.815;(5)(a) Information revealing the specific details that describe an alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation under age 18, or the identity or contact information of an alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation who is under age 18. Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses, location, photograph, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative, stepchild, or stepsibling of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Contact information includes phone numbers, email addresses, social media profiles, and user names and passwords.(b) For purposes of this subsection (5), "commercial sexual exploitation" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010;(6) Information contained in a local or regionally maintained gang database as well as the statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762;(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in RCW 69.43.165;(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and email address;(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from accessing information regarding his or her residence or business;(10) The felony firearm offense conviction database of felony firearm offenders established in RCW 43.43.822;(11) The identity of a state employee or officer who has in good faith filed a complaint with an ethics board, as provided in RCW 42.52.410, or who has in good faith reported improper governmental action, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, to the auditor or other public official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020;(12) The following security threat group information collected and maintained by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.745: (a) Information that could lead to the identification of a person's security threat group status, affiliation, or activities; (b) information that reveals specific security threats associated with the operation and activities of security threat groups; and (c) information that identifies the number of security threat group members, affiliates, or associates;(13) The global positioning system data that would indicate the location of the residence of an employee or worker of a criminal justice agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030;(14) Body worn camera recordings to the extent nondisclosure is essential for the protection of any person's right to privacy as described in RCW 42.56.050, including, but not limited to, the circumstances enumerated in (a) of this subsection. A law enforcement or corrections agency shall not disclose a body worn camera recording to the extent the recording is exempt under this subsection.(a) Disclosure of a body worn camera recording is presumed to be highly offensive to a reasonable person under RCW 42.56.050 to the extent it depicts:(i)(A) Any areas of a medical facility, counseling, or therapeutic program office where:(I) A patient is registered to receive treatment, receiving treatment, waiting for treatment, or being transported in the course of treatment; or(II) Health care information is shared with patients, their families, or among the care team; or(B) Information that meets the definition of protected health information for purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 or health care information for purposes of chapter 70.02 RCW;(ii) The interior of a place of residence where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy;(iii) An intimate image;(iv) A minor;(v) The body of a deceased person;(vi) The identity of or communications from a victim or witness of an incident involving domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020 or sexual assault as defined in RCW 70.125.030, or disclosure of intimate images as defined in RCW 9A.86.010. If at the time of recording the victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure of the recorded identity or communications, such desire shall govern; or(vii) The identifiable location information of a community-based domestic violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020, or emergency shelter as defined in RCW 70.123.020.(b) The presumptions set out in (a) of this subsection may be rebutted by specific evidence in individual cases.(c) In a court action seeking the right to inspect or copy a body worn camera recording, a person who prevails against a law enforcement or corrections agency that withholds or discloses all or part of a body worn camera recording pursuant to (a) of this subsection is not entitled to fees, costs, or awards pursuant to RCW 42.56.550 unless it is shown that the law enforcement or corrections agency acted in bad faith or with gross negligence.(d) A request for body worn camera recordings must:(i) Specifically identify a name of a person or persons involved in the incident;(ii) Provide the incident or case number;(iii) Provide the date, time, and location of the incident or incidents; or(iv) Identify a law enforcement or corrections officer involved in the incident or incidents.(e)(i) A person directly involved in an incident recorded by the requested body worn camera recording, an attorney representing a person directly involved in an incident recorded by the requested body worn camera recording, a person or his or her attorney who requests a body worn camera recording relevant to a criminal case involving that person, or the executive director from either the Washington state commission on African American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, or Hispanic affairs, has the right to obtain the body worn camera recording, subject to any exemption under this chapter or any applicable law. In addition, an attorney who represents a person regarding a potential or existing civil cause of action involving the denial of civil rights under the federal or state Constitution, or a violation of a United States department of justice settlement agreement, has the right to obtain the body worn camera recording if relevant to the cause of action, subject to any exemption under this chapter or any applicable law. The attorney must explain the relevancy of the requested body worn camera recording to the cause of action and specify that he or she is seeking relief from redaction costs under this subsection (14)(e).(ii) A law enforcement or corrections agency responding to requests under this subsection (14)(e) may not require the requesting individual to pay costs of any redacting, altering, distorting, pixelating, suppressing, or otherwise obscuring any portion of a body worn camera recording.(iii) A law enforcement or corrections agency may require any person requesting a body worn camera recording pursuant to this subsection (14)(e) to identify himself or herself to ensure he or she is a person entitled to obtain the body worn camera recording under this subsection (14)(e).(f)(i) A law enforcement or corrections agency responding to a request to disclose body worn camera recordings may require any requester not listed in (e) of this subsection to pay the reasonable costs of redacting, altering, distorting, pixelating, suppressing, or otherwise obscuring any portion of the body worn camera recording prior to disclosure only to the extent necessary to comply with the exemptions in this chapter or any applicable law.(ii) An agency that charges redaction costs under this subsection (14)(f) must use redaction technology that provides the least costly commercially available method of redacting body worn camera recordings, to the extent possible and reasonable.(iii) In any case where an agency charges a requestor for the costs of redacting a body worn camera recording under this subsection (14)(f), the time spent on redaction of the recording shall not count towards the agency's allocation of, or limitation on, time or costs spent responding to public records requests under this chapter, as established pursuant to local ordinance, policy, procedure, or state law.(g) For purposes of this subsection (14):(i) "Body worn camera recording" means a video and/or sound recording that is made by a body worn camera attached to the uniform or eyewear of a law enforcement or corrections officer while in the course of his or her official duties; and(ii) "Intimate image" means an individual or individuals engaged in sexual activity, including sexual intercourse as defined in RCW 9A.44.010 and masturbation, or an individual's intimate body parts, whether nude or visible through less than opaque clothing, including the genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple.(h) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict access to body worn camera recordings as otherwise permitted by law for official or recognized civilian and accountability bodies or pursuant to any court order.(i) Nothing in this section is intended to modify the obligations of prosecuting attorneys and law enforcement under Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83, 83 S. Ct. 1194, 10 L. Ed. 2d 215 (1963), Kyles v. Whitley, 541 U.S. 419, 115 S. Ct. 1555, 131 L. Ed.2d 490 (1995), and the relevant Washington court criminal rules and statutes.(j) A law enforcement or corrections agency must retain body worn camera recordings for at least 60 days and thereafter may destroy the records in accordance with the applicable records retention schedule;(15) Any records and information contained within the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system established in RCW 43.43.545;(16)(a) Survivor communications with, and survivor records maintained by, campus-affiliated advocates.(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict access to records maintained by a campus-affiliated advocate in the event that:(i) The survivor consents to inspection or copying;(ii) There is a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the survivor or another person;(iii) Inspection or copying is required by federal law; or(iv) A court of competent jurisdiction mandates that the record be available for inspection or copying.(c) "Campus-affiliated advocate" and "survivor" have the definitions in RCW 28B.112.030;(17) Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington state patrol pursuant to chapter 261, Laws of 2017;(18) Any and all audio or video recordings of child forensic interviews as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW. Such recordings are confidential and may only be disclosed pursuant to a court order entered upon a showing of good cause and with advance notice to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. However, if the child is an emancipated minor or has attained the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010, advance notice must be to the child. Failure to disclose an audio or video recording of a child forensic interview as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW is not grounds for penalties or other sanctions available under this chapter; ((and))(19) Information exempt from public disclosure and copying under RCW 43.10.305(2)(f); and(20) Information exempt from public inspection and copying under section 5 of this act.--- END ---